Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1602
Providing false information; penalty.

Any person who, as an authorized representative of a parent or legal guardian, transmits information required by subsections (3) through (6) of section 79-1601 knowing such information to be false shall be guilty of a Class IIIA misdemeanor.

Any person who knowingly gives false information to an authorized representative of a parent or legal guardian, knowing that such information is intended to be transmitted to the State Board of Education, shall be guilty of a Class IIIA misdemeanor.

Laws 1984, LB 928, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1701.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1005;

Laws 1999, LB 813, § 56.